Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.221

Professional gambling in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of professional gambling in the second degree if he or she engages in or knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to engage in professional gambling as defined in this chapter, and:

(a) Acts in concert with or conspires with less than five people; or

(b) Accepts wagers exceeding two thousand dollars during any thirty-day period on future contingent events; or

(c) The operation for whom the person works, or with which the person is involved, accepts wagers exceeding two thousand dollars during any thirty-day period on future contingent events; or

(d) Maintains a "gambling premises" as defined in this chapter; or

(e) Maintains gambling records as defined in RCW 9.46.0253.

(2) However, this section shall not apply to those activities enumerated in RCW 9.46.0305 through 9.46.0361 or to any act or acts in furtherance of such activities when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Professional gambling in the second degree is a class C felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 1997 c 78 s 3; 1994 c 218 s 12; 1991 c 261 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.